Massachusetts, session 194th, H2171.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 14P of chapter 151A of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2020
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking the last sentence in subsection (f) and inserting
the following:-
The director shall provide information secured under this section to other entities,
including any federal, state, or local governmental agency, including the 16 Masshire workforce
development boards, as defined under 20 CFR Chapter V pt 603, and a chief elected official as
that term is defined in Section 3102(9) of Title 29 of the United States Code, or the agents or
contractors of any governmental agency, where such information is to be used for:
evaluation of program performance, including, but not limited to, longitudinal outcome
analysis of programs (including programs funded by public or private funds or a combination
thereof) to the extent permitted by federal law;
financial or other analysis required by federal, state, or local law or regulation;
of 5

preparation of reports required by federal, state, or local law or regulation;
operation of public programs by such agencies, their agents, contractors and
subcontractors, whenever the director determines that such information sharing is for the purpose
of improving the quality or delivery of program services or to evaluate programs for equitable
access and outcomes;
establishment of common case management systems between federal, state, or local
agencies delivering or supporting workforce development services for a shared customer base,
wherever such common case management system is for the purpose of fostering workforce
development partnerships, program coordination, inter-agency collaboration, improving program
services, or creating operational efficiencies.
SECTION 2: Said section 14P of said chapter 151A, as so appearing, is hereby further
amended by inserting after subsection (i) the following subsection:-
(j) The department shall do the following:
(1) Develop the minimum requirements, as specified under 20 CFR pt 603 subpart B
section 603.10, for granting a request for disclosure of information authorized by this section
regardless of local, state, or federal funding source,
(2) Develop a standard application for submitting a request for disclosure of information
authorized by this section.
(3) Approve or deny a request for disclosure of information authorized by this subsection,
or request additional information, within 30 business days of receiving the standard application.
The entity submitting the application shall respond to any request by the department for
of 5

additional information within 20 business days of receipt of the department’s request. Within 30
calendar days of receiving any additional information, the department shall provide a final
approval or denial of the request for disclosure of information authorized by this subsection. Any
approval, denial, or request for additional information shall be in writing. Denials shall identify
the reason or category of reasons for the denial.
(4) Make publicly available on the department’s website: the minimum requirements for
granting a request for disclosure of information authorized by this section, the standard
application developed, the timeframe for information request determinations by the department,
contact information for assistance with requests for disclosures of information authorized by this
subdivision.
(5) For wage data requests that are approved for the department of career services and the
Masshire workforce development boards, on a quarterly basis the director of the department of
career services shall report to the department the following information on participants, at a
minimum, and to the extent the data are available, in order to be appended to the wage match
file: participant demographic information; workforce training program and service participation,
geographical location of services, and educational and other credential attainment. The
department shall adhere to all applicable state and federal privacy laws, to protect individuals’
private information while allowing measurement of aggregate data.
SECTION 3. Not later than 30 days after the effective date of this act, the executive
office of labor and workforce development, in consultation with division of unemployment
assistance, the department of career services, the commonwealth corporation, the Massachusetts
workforce association, the workforce solutions group, and any other appropriate agencies or
of 5

entities, shall convene a task force to develop the action steps required to improve state
workforce data infrastructure and promote data use, with the goal of creating data systems that
can illustrate how workforce education and training programs are providing opportunity for
sustainable employment in the commonwealth. The task force shall develop action steps to
accomplish the following:
(1) Connect education, workforce development and employment data with such data from
other states, to the extent permitted by law and in a manner that protects individuals’ private
information while allowing measurement of aggregate data; and
(2) Ensure adherence to data security and privacy principles, and all applicable state and
federal privacy laws, to protect individuals’ private information while allowing measurement of
aggregate data; and
(3) Improve access to and quality of the wage data is shared with the workforce system
by working with the department of career services and the department of unemployment
assistance to ensure that the wage data files shared between each agency have sufficient
information to allow for effective and ongoing workforce program evaluation; and
(4) Direct the executive office of labor and workforce development to participate in the
Massachusetts education-to-career data system and any other state longitudinal data system
efforts; and
(5) Review quarterly measures, identifying key trends, analyze equitable access to
programs and services, and ensure system partners, stakeholders, and the public have access to
data as allowed under state and federal privacy laws; and
of 5

(6) Develop a two and six-year plan to guide future system improvements.
The task force shall submit a report, with its findings and recommendations, together
with drafts of legislation necessary to carry those recommendations into effect by filing the same
with the clerks of the house of representatives and senate, the house and senate committees on
ways and means, the joint committee on economic development and emerging technologies, the
joint committee on labor and workforce development, the joint committee on higher education
and the office of the governor not later than January 1, 2026.
of 5